Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-245
Irrigation canal, defined; laws applicable.

Any canal constructed for the purpose of developing water power, or any other useful purpose, and from which water can be taken for irrigation, is hereby declared to be an irrigation canal and all laws relating to irrigation canals shall be deemed applicable thereto.

Laws 1893, c. 40, § 2, p. 378;

R.S.1913, § 3375;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 1, § 7, p. 832;

C.S.1922, § 8412;

C.S.1929, § 46-507;

R.S.1943, § 46-245.

This and other sections limit the location and construction of irrigation canals and ditches, as well as the land irrigated by same, to the basin containing the source of the water used, and require that all unused waters shall be returned to the stream from which diverted. Osterman v. Central Nebraska Public Power & Irr. Dist., 131 Neb. 356, 268 N.W. 334 (1936).